Maryland, session 2026, HB1415.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
3–201.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1415*

HOUSE BILL 1415
(b) “Commission” means the Maryland Police Training and Standards
Commission.
3–207.
(P) (1) (I) IN THIS SUBSECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(II) “IDENTIFICATION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 3–535
OF THIS TITLE.
(III) “LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY” HAS THE MEANING STATED
IN § 3–535 OF THIS TITLE.
(IV) “LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER” HAS THE MEANING STATED
IN § 3–535 OF THIS TITLE.
(2) (I) THE COMMISSION SHALL DEVELOP A MODEL POLICY
REQUIRING THE USE OF IDENTIFICATION BY A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER IN THE
COURSE OF DUTY CONSISTENT WITH § 3–535 OF THIS TITLE.
(II) THE MODEL POLICY DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION
SHALL INCLUDE LANGUAGE AFFIRMING THE STATE’S INTEREST IN:
1. PROMOTING PUBLIC SAFETY;
2. PREVENTING LAW ENFORCEMENT IMPERSONATION;
AND
3. PROMOTING TRANSPARENCY AND ACCOUNTABILITY.
(III) THE MODEL POLICY DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION
SHALL ADDRESS:
1. THE SIZE, PLACEMENT, CONTRAST, AND LEGIBILITY
OF IDENTIFICATION, INCLUDING REQUIREMENTS TO ENSURE VISIBILITY OF THE
IDENTIFICATION FROM A REASONABLE DISTANCE;
2. THE WAY IDENTIFICATION MUST BE DISPLAYED ON
DIFFERENT TYPES OF UNIFORMS, OUTERWEAR, AND PROTECTIVE CLOTHING,
INCLUDING JACKETS, VESTS, AND RAIN GEAR;
3. IDENTIFICATION REQUIREMENTS FOR
PLAINCLOTHES OR NONUNIFORMED LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS WHEN

HOUSE BILL 1415 3
EXERCISING OR PURPORTING TO EXERCISE LAW ENFORCEMENT AUTHORITY IN THE
STATE, INCLUDING THE USE OF REMOVABLE OR TEMPORARY IDENTIFICATION THAT
CAN PROMPTLY BE DISPLAYED;
4. NARROWLY TAILORED CIRCUMSTANCES IN WHICH
IDENTIFICATION MAY BE TEMPORARILY OBSCURED DUE TO AN IMMEDIATE THREAT
TO LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER SAFETY OR PUBLIC SAFETY AND ANY
DOCUMENTATION OR AFTER–ACTION REPORTING REQUIRED FOR DEVIATIONS; AND
5. TRAINING REQUIREMENTS FOR NEW AND CURRENT
LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS ON THE IDENTIFICATION REQUIREMENTS
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 3–535 OF THIS TITLE.
(3) A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY WITH LAW ENFORCEMENT
OFFICERS OPERATING IN THE STATE SHALL ADOPT A POLICY CONSISTENT WITH THE
MODEL POLICY DEVELOPED BY THE COMMISSION UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
3–535.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “IDENTIFICATION” MEANS A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER’S
AGENCY OR DEPARTMENT, LAST NAME, AND A BADGE NUMBER OR OTHER
IDENTIFICATION NUMBER.
(3) “LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY” INCLUDES A LAW ENFORCEMENT
AGENCY OF:
(I) THE STATE;
(II) ANOTHER STATE;
(III) A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE OR ANOTHER
STATE; AND
(IV) THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT.
(4) “LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER” MEANS:

HOUSE BILL 1415
(I) A MEMBER OF A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY WHO IS
AUTHORIZED, OR PURPORTS TO BE AUTHORIZED, TO EXERCISE LAW ENFORCEMENT
AUTHORITY IN THE STATE; OR
(II) A CONTRACTOR WORKING FOR A LAW ENFORCEMENT
AGENCY WHO IS AUTHORIZED, OR PURPORTS TO BE AUTHORIZED, TO EXERCISE LAW
ENFORCEMENT AUTHORITY IN THE STATE.
(B) (1) A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER SHALL WEAR IDENTIFICATION ON
THE LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER’S MOST OUTER LAYER OF CLOTHING WHILE IN
THE PERFORMANCE OF DUTY IN THE STATE.
(2) ON REQUEST OF ANOTHER, A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER SHALL
VERBALLY DISCLOSE IDENTIFICATION WHILE IN THE PERFORMANCE OF DUTY IN
THE STATE.
(C) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER
ACTIVELY ENGAGED IN AN UNDERCOVER OPERATION.
(D) (1) A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER WHO KNOWINGLY AND
WILLFULLY VIOLATES THIS SECTION:
(I) IS GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS
SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 2 YEARS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING
$2,000 OR BOTH; AND
(II) WAIVES ALL IMMUNITY IN A CIVIL ACTION FOR DAMAGES
BASED ON THE VIOLATION.
(2) A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION CONSTITUTES POLICE
MISCONDUCT FOR PURPOSES OF SUBTITLE 1 OF THIS TITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.